Missouri, session 2026, SB1788.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 385, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 385.281, to read as
follows:
385.281. 1. Any local taxes collected by a political
subdivision on aviation fuel or the revenues generated by an
international airport that is the subject of federal
assistance or the subject of assistance from the Missouri
department of transportation shall not be expended by such
political subdivision for any purpose other than the capital
or operating costs of:
(1) The airport;
(2) The local airport system; or
(3) Any other local facility that is owned or operated
by the person or entity that owns or operates the airport
that is directly and substantially related to the air
transportation of passengers or property.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall not apply to any local taxes collected by a political
subdivision in the case of the sale of a private airport to
a public entity if:

SB 1788 2
(1) The sale is approved by the U.S. Secretary of
Transportation;
(2) Funding is provided under federal law for any
portion of the public entity's acquisition of airport land;
and
(3) An amount equal to the remaining unamortized
portion of any airport improvement grant made under federal
law to that airport for purposes other than land
acquisition, amortized over a twenty year period, plus an
amount equal to the federal share of the current fair market
value of any land acquired with an airport improvement grant
made to that airport on or after October 1, 1996, is repaid
to the federal Department of Transportation by the private
owner. Repayments referred to in this subdivision shall be
treated as a recovery of prior year obligations.
3. Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent
the use of a state tax on aviation fuel to support a state
aviation program or the use of airport revenue on or off the
airport for a noise mitigation purpose.
✓